nl: Lade type: Midden; Centrifugaal; Voor; Knop; Hefboom; Magnetisch; Achter; Ster; Duimknop; Overige
th: ประเภทระบบลาก: กลาง; แรงเหวี่ยง; หน้า; ลูกบิด; คันโยก; แม่เหล็ก; หลัง; รูปดาว; ธัมบ์บาร์; อื่นๆ
ko: 드래그 유형: 센터; 원심력; 프런트; 노브; 레버; 마그네틱; 리어; 스타; 썸바; 기타
en: Drag type: Center; Centrifugal; Front; Knob; Lever; Magnetic; Rear; Star; Thumb bar; Other
de: Art des Bremssystems: Zentralbremse; Fliehkraftbremse; Frontbremse; Drehknopf; Hebelbremse; Magnetbremse; Heckbremse; Sternbremse; Daumentaste; Sonstige
sk-SK: Typ brzdného mechanizmu: Stredná; Odstredivá; Predná; Otočná; Páková; Magnetická; Zadná; Hviezdicová; Palcová lišta; Iné
it: Tipo trascinamento: Centrale; Centrifuga; Anteriore; A manopola; A leva; Magnetica; Posteriore; A stella; Thumb bar; Altro
lt-LT: Stabdžio tipas: Centrinis; Išcentrinis; Priekinis; Rankenėlė; Svirtis; Magnetinis; Galinis; Žvaigždinis; Nykščio svirtis; Kita
zh-TW: 煞車類型: 中央; 離心式; 前置; 旋鈕; 槓桿; 磁性; 後置; 星型; 拇指板; 其他
pt-BR: Tipo de arrasto: Centro; Centrífugo; Dianteiro; Botão rotativo; Alavanca; Magnético; Traseiro; Estrela; Barra de polegar; Outros
cs: Typ brzdného mechanismu navijáku: Středová; Odstředivá; Přední; Otočný knoflík; Páková; Magnetická; Zadní; Hvězdicová; Palcová páčka; Jiné
bg-BG: Тип аванс: Централен; Центробежен; Преден; С врътка; Лост; Магнитен; Заден; Звездообразен; Бутон за палеца; Друго
sv: Dragtyp: Mitten; Centrifugal; Fram; Ratt; Spak; Magnetisk; Bak; Stjärna; Tumtangent; Övrigt
zh-CN: 拖拽类型: 中心; 离心; 前置; 旋钮; 推杆; 磁性; 后置; 星形; 拇指压板; 其他
es: Tipo de arrastre: Central; Centrífugo; Delantero; Perilla; Palanca; Magnético; Trasero; Estrella; Barra de pulgar; Otro
ru: Тип фрикциона: Центральный; Центробежный; Передний; Ручка; Рычажный; Магнитный; Задний; Звездочный; Клавиша; Другое
nb: Dra-type: Senter; Sentrifugal; Front; Knott; Spak; Magnetisk; Bak; Stjerne; Tommelknapp; Annet
ja: ドラッグタイプ: センター; 遠心力; フロント; ノブ; レバー; マグネット; リア; スター; サムバー; その他
da: Træktype: Centrum; Centrifugal; Front; Drejeknap; Vægtstang; Magnetisk; Bag; Stjerne; Tommelfingerudløser; Andet
fi: Jarrutyyppi: Keski; Keskipako; Etu; Nuppi; Vipu; Magneettinen; Taka; Tähti; Peukalovipu; Muu
vi: Loại hãm: Giữa; Ly tâm; Trước; Núm vặn; Đòn bẩy; Từ tính; Sau; Hình sao; Nút bấm bằng ngón tay cái; Khác
hr-HR: Vrsta povlačenja: Središnja; Centrifugalna; Prednja; S gumbom; Polužna; Magnetska; Stražnja; Zvjezdasta; S polugom za palac; Ostalo
hu: Fék típusa: Középső; Centrifugális; Első; Gombos; Karos; Mágneses; Hátsó; Csillag; Hüvelykujjas; Egyéb
tr: Kalama türü: Orta; Santrifüjlü; Ön; Düğme; Kol; Manyetik; Arka; Yıldız; Başparmak mandalı; Diğer
pt-PT: Tipo de arrastar: Centro; Centrífugo; Frente; Botão rotativo; Alavanca; Magnético; Traseiro; Estrela; Barra de polegar; Outro
el: Τύπος πέδησης: Κεντρικό; Φυγοκεντρικό; Μπροστινό; Περιστροφικό; Μοχλός; Μαγνητικό; Πίσω; Αστέρι; Μπάρα αντίχειρα; Άλλο
pl: Typ hamulca: Środkowy; Odśrodkowy; Przedni; Pokrętło; Dźwigniowy; Magnetyczny; Tylny; Gwiaździsty; Przycisk pod kciuk; Inne
sl-SI: Vrsta vlečenja: Sredina; Centrifugalna; Sprednja; Gumb; Vzvod; Magnetna; Zadnja; Zvezdasta; Ročica za palec; Drugo
fr: Type de frein: Central; Centrifuge; Avant; Bouton; Levier; Magnétique; Arrière; En étoile; Gâchette; Autre
ro-RO: Tipul de frânare: Centrală; Centrifugală; Frontală; Cu buton rotativ; Cu manetă; Magnetică; Spate; În stea; Clapetă (thumb bar); Altele